Hawaii statutes.
§321-357 Early intervention special fund;
purpose and use. (a) The purpose of the early intervention special fund
is to expand and enhance early intervention services for infants and toddlers
with special needs by providing a cooperative funding mechanism between the
public and private sectors to work together to make and secure appropriations
and donations to the fund.

(b) The department may procure services under
chapters 103D and 103F in accordance with criteria and procedures established
by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 91, for community-based, family-centered,
early intervention services including but not limited to:

(1) Programs to provide early intervention services
for infants and toddlers with developmental delays or at biological or environmental
risk;

(2) Family support programs to strengthen families to
reduce the risk of child abuse and neglect;

(3) Training and education for professionals,
paraprofessionals, and families; and

(4) Research, evaluation, and data management related
to early intervention services.

(c) Services to be procured under this section
shall be in accordance with chapters 103D and 103F and take the following
forms:

(1) Purchase of service contracts to private
nonprofit organizations, public agencies, or qualified individuals to provide
community-based, family-centered, early intervention services; or

(2) Direct payments for services, educational
materials, training, quality assurance, equipment, data collection, and program
evaluation.

(d) The Hawaii early intervention coordinating
council shall make recommendations to the department for the expenditure of
moneys from the early intervention special fund. [L 1997, c 378, pt of §2; am L
1998, c 43, pt of §1(1); am L 2016, c 43, §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next